Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,172
Disposition of complaint; claimant; rejection; court action authorized.

If the claimant under section 85-9,170 elects not to accept the written disposition of such complaint made by the governing board under such section, he or she may, within one hundred eighty days after receipt of such disposition, file an original action in the district court of the judicial district where such educational institution is located, for equitable relief and compensatory money damages. If such action includes a claim for money damages, such claimant shall be entitled to a trial by jury as to such claim for damages, unless he or she expressly waives in writing such trial by jury.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1092.